Connecticut, session 2026, HB05069.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
____ dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the Department of
Transportation for the purpose of providing a grant-in-aid to the town
of New Milford for the completion of road work in said town that is
recommended in the department's October 2024 New Milford Road
Safety Audit report.